Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-750
Fugitives from this state; warrant; Governor's duty.

Whenever the Governor of this state shall demand a person charged with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of his bail, probation or parole in this state, from the Executive Authority of any other state, or from the Chief Justice or an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand under the laws of the United States, he shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state, to some agent, commanding him to receive the person so charged if delivered to him and convey him to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 22, p. 565.